Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.040

Director.

(1)(a) The governor shall appoint the director of the office and determine the director's compensation. The governor shall select the director from a list of three candidates recommended by the advisory board unless the governor declines to select any of the candidates provided. If the governor declines to select a candidate proposed by the advisory board, the governor may request the advisory board to provide additional qualified nominees for consideration or may offer an alternative candidate who may be appointed following approval by a majority of the advisory board.

(b) Prior to selecting the director, the governor shall consider the results of a background check, including an assessment of criminal history, and research of social media and affiliations to check for racial bias and conflicts of interest.

(2) The director shall hold office for a term of three years and continue to hold office until reappointed or until his or her successor is appointed. The governor may remove the director prior to the expiration of the director's term for neglect of duty, misconduct, or inability to perform duties.

[ 2021 c 318 s 303.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.